Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2488.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 301.1(d) and 311(8) of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Enabling Act, are amended to read:Section 301.1. Delegation of Taxing Powers and Restrictions Thereon.--* * *(d) Each political subdivision levying the local services tax at a rate exceeding ten dollars ($10) shall, and each political subdivision levying the local services tax at a rate of ten dollars ($10) or less may, by ordinance or resolution, exempt any person from the local services tax whose total earned income and net profits from all sources within the political subdivision is less than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) for the calendar year in which the local services tax is levied. Each political subdivision levying the local services tax at a rate exceeding fifty-two dollars ($52) shall, and each political subdivision levying the local services tax at a rate of fifty-two dollars ($52) or less may, by ordinance or resolution, exempt any person from the local services tax whose total earned income and net profits from all sources within the political subdivision is less than fifteen thousand six hundred dollars ($15,600) for the calendar year in which the local services tax is levied.* * *Section 311. Limitations on Rates of Specific Taxes.--No taxes levied under the provisions of this chapter shall be levied by any political subdivision on the following subjects exceeding the rates specified in this section:* * *(8) Local services taxes, [fifty-two dollars ($52)] one hundred fifty-six dollars ($156).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2488PN3360 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930